Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Arts Commission .......... $ 3,922,866
(2) Business, innovation and
trade.......................................... $ 3,440,456
(3) Debt service .............................. $ 54,126,740
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 22,078,923
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $312,203,054
(3) Operations................................. $ 2,813,872
(4) Arts and Cultural Trust ........... $ 12,628,295
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade...................................  $ 54,601,780
(2) Operations.................................  $ 8,631,129
(3) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,253,432
(4) Lottery bond debt service ......... $ 51,998,740
(5) Infrastructure ........................... $ 1,579,520
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Business Development
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 5,980,869
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $ 34,864,879
(3) Operations................................. $ 223,166
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 2,031,548
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
(a) Oregon Business Development  Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial Devel-
opment Loan  Fund (ORS 285B.758), Credit Enhancement Fund (ORS 285B.215) and Small
Business Expansion Loan Fund (section 2, chapter 71, Oregon Laws 2018).
(b) Special Public Works Fund (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563), Marine  Nav-
igation Improvement Fund (ORS 777.267), Oregon Port Revolving Fund (ORS  285A.708), Safe
Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  (ORS 285A.213) and Brownfields Redevelopment Fund
(ORS 285A.188).
(2) Debt service, excluding debt  service on lottery revenue bonds and general obligation
bonds.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 2